incubator/apertium-glk/problem.glk.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?><!-- -*-nxml-*- -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ؤئاآأٰبپتثجچحخدذرزژسشصضطظعغفقکگلمنهوی</alphabet>
  <!-- symbols -->
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="time"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="sep"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="email"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="subs"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->
    <pardef n="کیتاب__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>أن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <pardef n="imp_endings">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-1-1sg">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-1-3sg">
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pers-1-pp">
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-2-3sg">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-3-3sg">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pers-3-pp">
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pers-1-rest">
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یدی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یدی</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کون__vblex" c="present">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بوکون__vblex" c="present subjunctive">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ببه__vblex" c="present subjunctive 1sg/3sg for verb with i-vowel harmony">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بیبی__vblex" c="present subjunctive other endings for verb with i-vowel harmony">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نوکون__vblex" c="negative present">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نبه__vblex" c="negative present 1sg/3sg for verb with i-vowel harmony">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نیبی__vblex" c="negative present other endings for verb with i-vowel harmony">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بوکود/ن__vblex" c="preterite (past)">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بوشو/ئون__vblex" c="preterite (past) o-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-3-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-3-pp"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئون<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بز/ِئن__vblex" c="preterite (past) e-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ی</l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ِئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بدَ/ئن__vblex" c="preterite (past) a-vowel stem end">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-1sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-3sg"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-rest"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="pers-1-pp"/></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="کیتاب"><i>کیتاب</i><par n="کیتاب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شوئون"><p><l>بوشو</l><r>شو</r></p><par n="بوشو/ئون__vblex"/></e>
